Tennessee, session 114, HB2398.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 71, Chapter 5, Part 1, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
(a) Notwithstanding § 50-5-105, a high school student who is older than fifteen
(15) years of age but younger than nineteen (19) years of age may work in a child care
center outside of school hours or during school hours through a work-based learning
program if the student has completed at least two (2) courses in a program of study that
falls under the education and training career cluster.
(b) This section does not permit a high school student to work in a child care
center located in an occupied residence of the primary caregiver.
(c) The department may promulgate rules to effectuate this section. The rules
must be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act,
compiled in title 4, chapter 5.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
HB2398
012747
- 1 -